Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 8.2. Southeast Interstate Low-Level Radioactive
Waste Management Compact.

§ 32.1-238.6.
Repealed by Acts 1983, c. 213.

§§ 32.1-238.6:1 through 32.1-238.10.

Repealed by Acts 1988, c. 891.

Cross references.

For the Southeast Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Management Compact, see now §

10.1-1500

et seq.

Editor’s note.

Repealed §

32.1-238.6:1

was amended by Acts 1988, c. 390. The amendment by c. 390 has been incorporated into §

10.1-1500

, which is comparable to that section.